Hawaii statutes.
§147-5 Prohibition of deceptive packing.
No person shall sell, expose, or offer for sale, or transport for sale in open
or closed packages agricultural commodities packed in such manner that the face
or shown surface is so superior to the unexposed portion as to quality, size,
condition, or in any other respect as to materially misrepresent the contents.
[L 1945, c 252, §5; RL 1955, §22-5; HRS §147-5]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next